Utah statutes.
58-67-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of medicine, on or for any person in Utah, as a physician and surgeon, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-67-305.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of physician and surgeon.

